Maine, session 132, LD298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Creates one Behavioral Health Coordinator Supervisor position to oversee the
activities of the Behavioral Health Coordinator positions and coordinate with the state
police field troops.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $71,302 $73,584
All Other $3,250 $3,250
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $74,552 $76,834
159
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $38,393 $39,622
All Other $1,750 $1,750
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $40,143 $41,372
2116 State Police 0291
Initiative: Creates 3 Behavioral Health Coordinator positions assigned to the state police
Southern Field Troop, Central Field Troop and Troop F responsible for making decisions
about the health, safety and welfare of persons in the community who have interacted with
law enforcement professionals and are in need of services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 3.000 3.000
Personal Services $177,969 $183,663
All Other $9,750 $9,750
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $187,719 $193,413
3226
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $95,829 $98,895
All Other $5,250 $5,250
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $101,079 $104,145
3383
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $262,271 $270,247
Page 1 - 132LR0750(01)

HIGHWAY FUND $141,222 $145,517
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $403,493 $415,764